Hawaii statutes.
[§159-22] Post-mortem inspection;
reinspection. The board shall cause to be made post-mortem examination and
inspection of the carcasses and parts thereof of all cattle, sheep, swine,
goats, horses, mules, and other equines, capable of use as human food, to be
prepared at any slaughtering, meat-canning, salting, packing, rendering, or
similar establishment in this State in which the meat or meat products are
prepared solely for intrastate commerce; and the carcasses and parts thereof of
all the animals found to be unadulterated shall be marked, stamped, tagged, or
labeled, as "Hawaii Inspected and Passed"; and the inspector shall
label, mark, stamp, or tag as "Hawaii Inspected and Condemned", all
carcasses and parts thereof of animals found to be adulterated; and all
carcasses and parts thereof thus inspected and condemned shall be destroyed for
food purposes by the establishment in the presence of an inspector, and the
board may remove the inspector from the establishment which fails to destroy
any such condemned carcass or part thereof. The inspector, after any
inspection shall, when the inspector deems it necessary, reinspect any
carcasses or parts thereof to determine whether since the prior inspection the
same shall have become adulterated and if any carcass or any part thereof
shall, upon examination and inspection subsequent to the prior examination and
inspection, be found to be adulterated, it shall be destroyed for food purposes
by the establishment in the presence of an inspector, and the board may
withdraw inspection from any establishment which fails to destroy any condemned
carcass or part thereof.

The foregoing provisions, including those in
section 159-21, shall apply to all cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, mules,
and other equines and to all carcasses or parts of carcasses, meat or meat
products thereof, capable of use as human food, which may be brought into any
slaughtering, meat-canning, salting, packing, rendering, or similar
establishment, where inspection under this part is maintained, and the
examination and inspection shall be had before the carcasses or parts thereof
shall be allowed to enter into any establishment wherein the same are to be
treated and prepared for meat products; and the foregoing provisions shall also
apply to all products which, after having been issued from any such
slaughtering, meat-canning, salting, packing, rendering, or similar
establishment, shall be returned to the same or to any similar establishment
where the inspection is maintained. The board may limit the entry of
carcasses, part of carcasses, meat or meat products, and other materials into
any establishment at which inspection under this part is maintained, under
conditions as it may prescribe to assure that allowing the entry of meat or
meat products into the inspected establishment will be consistent with the
purpose of this chapter.

The board shall cause to be made by
veterinarian and inspector appointed for that purpose an examination and
inspection of all meat or meat products prepared in any slaughtering,
meat-canning, salting, packing, rendering, or similar establishment, where the
meat or meat products are prepared only for intrastate commerce and for the
purpose of any examination and inspection, the inspector shall have access at
all times, by day or night, whether the establishment be operated or not, to
every part of the establishment; and the inspector shall mark, stamp, tag, or
label as "Hawaii Inspected and Passed" all the products found to be
unadulterated; and the inspector shall label, mark, stamp, or tag as
"Hawaii Inspected and Condemned" all the products found adulterated,
and all condemned meat or meat products shall be destroyed for food purposes,
as hereinbefore provided, and the board may withdraw inspection from any
establishment which fails to destroy the condemned meat or meat products. [L
1969, c 214, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next